West Virginia, session 2026, HB4429.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 11G.  WORK/INCARCERATION ACT (PILOT). §62-11G-1.  Short title. This article may be cited as the "Work/Incarceration Act." §62-11G-2.  Application. This article applies to adult offenders that have not been convicted of a crime of violence or sex-related offense.  The article also applies only to offenders sentenced to two years' incarceration or less. §62-11G-3.  Limitations. This article allows one county to receive approval to establish a work/incarceration prison.  Those counties interested in establishing such a facility shall develop a plan and submit the plan to the Division of Corrections for review and approval.  The Division of Corrections shall propose rules of operation and reporting for this work/incarceration prison for legislative approval in accordance with §29A-3-1 et seq. of this code. §62-11G-4.  Eligible offenders. (a) An eligible offender is any person meeting the application standards set forth in §62-11G-2 of this code, who is sentenced to the work/incarceration prison by a magistrate or a circuit judge.  Offenders are eligible for a 20 percent reduction in sentence for participation in the work/incarceration program but shall maintain complete adherence to rules of conduct as established by the Division of Corrections.(b) An offender sentenced to the work/incarceration prison by a magistrate or circuit judge, who commits any serious violation of the rules of conduct as established by the Division of Corrections and Rehabilitation, shall be transferred to a correctional facility with an additional year added to that offender's original sentence.(c) The work/incarceration prison superintendent may reject any offender from admittance and may remove any offender from the work/incarceration prison population for cause, as established by rules established by the Division of Corrections and Rehabilitation.  If admittance is disallowed or if the offender is removed, alternative sentencing shall be provided by the proper judicial authority. §62-11G-5.  Suggested appropriation. The Legislature may appropriate $500,000 to the county establishing the initial work/incarceration prison for the initial expense of establishment of the work/incarceration prison.  The plan submitted to the Division of Corrections and Rehabilitation for approval, as provided in §62-11G-3 of this code, shall include means and methods of making the work/incarceration prison self-sustaining using work product and service from the offenders in the work/incarceration prison. §62-11G-6.  Admittance of offenders from other counties. The county establishing the work/incarceration prison may allow at its option offenders from other counties to be incarcerated and may charge a fee equal to 50 percent of that charged by the Regional Jail and Correctional Facility Authority to house prisoners. §62-11G-7.  Evaluation. The Division of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall monitor and evaluate the work/incarceration prison to determine effectiveness, efficiency, and potential for expansion into other counties and report to the Legislature annually.